New York, session 2025-2026, A7944.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Continuity 2 of Cancer Care Act" or the "COCCA". 3 § 2. Section 3216 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 4 subsection (n) to read as follows: 5 (n) (1) For the purpose of this subsection: 6 (A) "course of treatment" shall mean that the treatment protocol aimed 7 at combating the insured's cancer has been administered and the insured 8 is clinically stable. Additionally, follow-up appointments/care for up 9 to ninety days after the insured is found to be clinically stable shall 10 also be considered part of the insured's course of treatment. 11 (B) "clinical stability" shall mean ninety days have passed since the 12 treatment has been fully administered and: (i) the insured shows the 13 intended result from their treatment protocol without complications that 14 would require ongoing management by the provider's physicians; or (ii) 15 the insured is receiving maintenance treatment to control the cancer 16 from reoccurring. 17 (2) An insurer shall, where an insured is receiving treatment for 18 cancer at a hospital, doctor's office or any other provider that 19 provides oncology treatment which such insurer was covering in whole or 20 in part and such insurer and such provider cannot come to an agreement 21 during contract negotiations, continue to cover such treatments, at the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10785-02-5 A. 7944--A 2 1 rate payable under the prior contract, for such insured until the 2 conclusion of such insured's entire course of treatment and the individ- 3 ual is found to be clinically stable, provided that the rate payable 4 under the prior contract shall be adjusted by the applicable Medicare 5 Economic Index minus one percentage point applied to payment rates at 6 the start of the next calendar year, and for each succeeding calendar 7 year, for individuals that are continuing to receive treatment pursuant 8 to this provision. 9 § 3. Section 3221 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 10 subsection (v) to read as follows: 11 (v) (1) For the purpose of this subsection: 12 (A) "course of treatment" shall mean that the treatment protocol aimed 13 at combating the insured's cancer has been administered and the insured 14 is clinically stable. Additionally, follow-up appointments/care for up 15 to ninety days after the insured is found to be clinically stable shall 16 also be considered part of the insured's course of treatment. 17 (B) "clinical stability" shall mean ninety days have passed since the 18 treatment has been fully administered and: (i) the insured shows the 19 intended result from their treatment protocol without complications that 20 would require ongoing management by the provider's physicians; or (ii) 21 the insured is receiving maintenance treatment to control the cancer 22 from reoccurring. 23 (2) An insurer shall, where an insured is receiving treatment for 24 cancer at a hospital, doctor's office or any other provider that 25 provides oncology treatment which such insurer was covering in whole or 26 in part and such insurer and such provider cannot come to an agreement 27 during contract negotiations, continue to cover such treatments, at the 28 rate payable under the prior contract, for such insured until the 29 conclusion of such insured's entire course of treatment and the individ- 30 ual is found to be clinically stable, provided that the rate payable 31 under the prior contract shall be adjusted by the applicable Medicare 32 Economic Index minus one percentage point applied to payment rates at 33 the start of the next calendar year, and for each succeeding calendar 34 year, for individuals that are continuing to receive treatment pursuant 35 to this provision. 36 § 4. Section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 37 subsection (i) to read as follows: 38 (i) (1) For the purpose of this subsection: 39 (A) "course of treatment" shall mean that the treatment protocol aimed 40 at combating the insured's cancer has been administered and the insured 41 is clinically stable. Additionally, follow-up appointments/care for up 42 to ninety days after the insured is found to be clinically stable shall 43 also be considered part of the insured's course of treatment. 44 (B) "clinical stability" shall mean ninety days have passed since the 45 treatment has been fully administered and: (i) the insured shows the 46 intended result from their treatment protocol without complications that 47 would require ongoing management by the provider's physicians; or (ii) 48 the insured is receiving maintenance treatment to control the cancer 49 from reoccurring. 50 (2) An insurer shall, where an insured is receiving treatment for 51 cancer at a hospital, doctor's office or any other provider that 52 provides oncology treatment which such insurer was covering in whole or 53 in part and such insurer and such provider cannot come to an agreement 54 during contract negotiations, continue to cover such treatments, at the 55 rate payable under the previous contract, for such insured until the 56 conclusion of such insured's entire course of treatment and the insured A. 7944--A 3 1 is found to be clinically stable, provided that the rate payable under 2 the prior contract shall be adjusted by the applicable Medicare Economic 3 Index minus one percentage point applied to payment rates at the start 4 of the next calendar year, and for each succeeding calendar year, for 5 individuals that are continuing to receive treatment pursuant to this 6 provision. 7 § 5. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 4406-j 8 to read as follows: 9 § 4406-j. Continuity of cancer care. 1. For the purpose of this 10 section: 11 (a) "course of treatment" shall mean that the treatment protocol aimed 12 at combating the insured's cancer has been administered and the insured 13 is clinically stable. Additionally, follow-up appointments/care for up 14 to ninety days after the insured is found to be clinically stable shall 15 also be considered part of the insured's course of treatment. 16 (b) "clinical stability" shall mean ninety days have passed since the 17 treatment has been fully administered and: (i) the insured shows the 18 intended result from their treatment protocol without complications that 19 would require ongoing management by the provider's physicians; or (ii) 20 the insured is receiving maintenance treatment to control the cancer 21 from reoccurring. 22 2. An organization shall, where an insured is receiving treatment 23 for cancer at a hospital, doctor's office or any other provider that 24 provides oncology treatment which such organization was covering in 25 whole or in part and such organization and such provider cannot 26 come to an agreement during contract negotiations, continue to cover 27 such treatments, at the rate payable under the prior contract, for such 28 insured until the conclusion of such insured's entire course of treat- 29 ment and the individual is found to be clinically stable, provided that 30 the rate payable under the prior contract shall be adjusted by the 31 applicable Medicare Economic Index minus one percentage point applied to 32 payment rates at the start of the next calendar year, and for each 33 succeeding calendar year, for individuals that are continuing to receive 34 treatment pursuant to this provision. 35 § 6. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2404-e 36 to read as follows: 37 § 2404-e. Cancer; duty to continue treatment. 1. For the purpose of 38 this section: 39 (a) "course of treatment" shall mean that the treatment protocol aimed 40 at combating the insured's cancer has been administered and the insured 41 is clinically stable. Additionally, follow-up appointments/care for up 42 to ninety days after the insured is found to be clinically stable shall 43 also be considered part of the insured's course of treatment. 44 (b) "clinical stability" shall mean ninety days have passed since the 45 treatment has been fully administered and: (i) the insured shows the 46 intended result from their treatment protocol without complications that 47 would require ongoing management by the provider's physicians; or (ii) 48 the insured is receiving maintenance treatment to control the cancer 49 from reoccurring. 50 2. Where a person is receiving treatment for cancer at a hospital, 51 doctor's office or any other provider that provides oncology treatment 52 which is covered by such person's insurance company and such provider 53 and such person's insurance company cannot come to an agreement during 54 contract negotiations, such person shall remain under continuous care of 55 such provider and such person's insurance shall continue to provide such 56 coverage for such treatments, at the rate payable under the prior A. 7944--A 4 1 contract, until the conclusion of such person's entire course of treat- 2 ment and the insured is found to be clinically stable, provided that the 3 rate payable under the prior contract shall be adjusted by the applica- 4 ble Medicare Economic Index minus one percentage point applied to 5 payment rates at the start of the next calendar year, and for each 6 succeeding calendar year, for individuals that are continuing to receive 7 treatment pursuant to this provision. 8 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately.